Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-272
Affidavits to correct defects; validity.

All such instruments now appearing of record in the chain of title to any real estate, are legalized; and they shall have the same force and effect as those herein provided for.

Laws 1913, c. 75, § 2, p. 219;

R.S.1913, § 6254;

C.S.1922, § 5653;

C.S.1929, § 76-259;

R.S.1943, § 76-272.

Affidavit recorded in office of register of deeds is prima facie evidence of facts stated therein. Schlake v. Healey, 108 Neb. 35, 187 N.W. 427 (1922).